Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1168.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1325. Contributions to local fire companies.(a) Option.--The department shall provide for all of the following on the department's publicly accessible Internet website:(1) The ability of an applicant for an original or renewal driver's license or identification card to make a contribution of $5 to the applicant's local fire company.(2) The ability of an applicant for a renewal vehicle registration to make a contribution of $5 to the applicant's local fire company.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) The ability of an applicant for a two-year vehicle registration to make a contribution of $10 to the applicant's local fire company.(b) Implementation.--(1) A contribution under subsection (a) shall be added, as appropriate, to the regular fee for:(i) an original or renewal driver's license or identification card; and(ii) a renewal of a vehicle registration.(2) One contribution under subsection (a) may be made for:(i) the issuance or renewal of a driver's license or identification card; and(ii) a renewal vehicle registration.(c) Deposit of contributions.--(1) Money collected under this section shall be transferred quarterly from the Motor License Fund to the Local Fire Company Fund established in section 1905(e)(relating to payments to special funds).(2) The department shall determine on a quarterly basis the contributions received under this section, itemized by each city, township, borough and incorporated town according to the address of the registered vehicle owners who made the contributions, and shall report the information to the State Fire Commissioner.(3) The State Fire Commissioner shall distribute the amount deposited under paragraph (1) to the local fire companies of the cities, townships, boroughs and incorporated towns itemized in the report under paragraph (2), in the amounts itemized in the report.20250HB1168PN1305 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Reimbursement.--The State Fire Commissioner shall, from money appropriated or otherwise available to the State Fire Commissioner, reimburse the Motor License Fund for the actual costs incurred by the department in the administration of this section.Section 2. Section 1905 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1905. Payments to special funds.* * *(e) Local Fire Company Fund.--(1) The Local Fire Company Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(2) All money in the Local Fire Company Fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the State Fire Commissioner for the purpose of paying contributions received under section 1325 (relating to contributions to local fire companies) to local fire companies.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1168PN1305 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718